src-fst-morphology-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Nouns and their classification
Noun is the part-of-speech for words which require declination in number
and case. Additionally nouns may have optional possessive suffixes and
clitics combined freely at the end. While some of the nouns may exhibit
limited comparative derivations, generally words that can undergo
comparation must be  classified into adjectives. The proper nouns that
are written in initial  capital letters except when derived are handled
separately under proper nouns, but the classification is the same.

The nominals are classified by combination of the stem variations, suffix
allomorphs and the vowel harmony. The nouns have number, case, possessive
and clitic suffixes:

* Noun examples:*
* *talo:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house)
* *taloa:* `talo+N+Sg+Par`
* *taloissa:* `talo+N+Pl+Ine`
* *talostani:* `talo+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1`
* *talollako:* `talo+N+Sg+Ade+Qst`
* *taloiltammepa:* `talo+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/pa`
The classification is based on suffix allomorphs, harmony, and the stem
variation:
* *taloja:* `talo+N+Pl+Par`
* *sälöjä:* `sälö+N+Pl+Par` (Eng. # splinter)
* *valtioita:* `valtio+N+Pl+Par` (Eng. # state)
* *lepakot:* `lepakko+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # bat)
* *padoissa:* `pato+N+Pl+Ine` (Eng. # dam)
The minimal set to determine which paradigm or class noun belongs to is to
check how it inflects in singulars of nominative,
essive and inessive, plurals of essive, elative, partitive, illative, and
GENITIVE. Find out stems and suffixes and match.

naan+N:naan also naan is an Indian bread with `NOUN_PUNK` paradigm

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
